Utah statutes.
38-11-301.   Registration as a qualified beneficiary -- Initial regular assessment -- Affidavit.

(1)  A person licensed as of July 1, 1995, as a contractor under the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act, in license classifications that regularly engage in providing qualified services shall be automatically registered as a qualified beneficiary upon payment of the initial assessment.

(2)  A person applying for licensure as a contractor after July 1, 1995, in license classifications that regularly engage in providing qualified services shall be automatically registered as a qualified beneficiary upon issuance of a license and payment of the initial assessment.

(3) (a)  After July 1, 1995, any person providing qualified services as other than a contractor as provided in Subsection (1) or any person exempt from licensure under the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act, may register as a qualified beneficiary by:

(i)  submitting an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(ii)  demonstrating registration with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code as required by state law;

(iii)  paying a registration fee determined by the division under Section 63J-1-504; and

(iv)  paying the initial assessment established under Subsection (4), and any special assessment determined by the division under Subsection 38-11-206(1).

(b)  A person who does not register under Subsection (1), (2), or (3)(a) shall be prohibited from recovering under the fund as a qualified beneficiary for work performed as qualified  services while not registered with the fund.

(4) (a)  An applicant shall pay an initial assessment determined by the division under  Section 63J-1-504.

(b)  The initial assessment to qualified registrants under Subsection (1) shall be made not later than July 15, 1995, and shall be paid no later than November 1, 1995.

(c)  The initial assessment to qualified registrants under Subsections (2) and (3) shall be paid at the time of application for license or registration, however, beginning on May 1, 1996, only one initial assessment or special assessments thereafter shall be required for persons having multiple licenses under this section.

(5)  A person shall be considered to have been registered as a qualified beneficiary on January 1, 1995, for purposes of meeting the requirements of Subsection 38-11-204(1)(c)(ii) if the person:

(a) (i)  is licensed on or before July 1, 1995, as a contractor under the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act, in license classifications that regularly engage in providing qualified services; or

(ii)  provides qualified services after July 1, 1995, as other than a contractor as provided in Subsection (5)(a)(i) or is exempt from licensure under the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act; and

(b)  registers as a qualified beneficiary under Subsection (1) or (3) on or before November 1, 1995.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

